Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3,123
Department; agreements with financial institutions; authorized.

The department may enter into agreements with financial institutions doing business in this state to operate the data match system described in section 77-3,122. A financial institution may charge a reasonable fee, not to exceed actual cost, to be paid by the department for the service of reporting matches as required by section 77-3,122.

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 27.